Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2011.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 51 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 3106. TRICARE Premium Reimbursement Program.(a) Establishment and administration.--(1) The TRICARE Premium Reimbursement Program is established within the department.(2) The department shall administer the program to provide grants to each eligible recipient for costs paid by the eligible recipient and associated with one or more of the following:(i) A premium paid for individual coverage through the TRICARE Reserve Select program.1234567891011121314151617 (ii) A premium paid for any member of the immediate family of the eligible recipient covered under the TRICARE Reserve Select program.(iii) A premium paid for individual coverage under the TRICARE dental program.(iv) A premium paid for any member of the immediate family of the eligible recipient receiving dental benefits under the TRICARE dental program.(b) Grants.--The department may award to an eligible recipient grants of up to $60 for the reimbursement of the total amount of premiums paid each month by the eligible recipient for the coverages listed under subsection (a)(2).(c) Funding.--The department shall accept funding from the following sources:(1) Money appropriated to the department to carry out the purposes of this section.(2) Gifts or donations of money, securities or other personal property, except real estate, to carry out the purposes of this section. Interest and income generated by the gifts or donations shall be used to carry out the purposes of this section.(d) Guidelines and regulations.--The department shall prescribe and adopt any policy guideline or regulation necessary to implement, administer and enforce the program.(e) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Eligible recipient." An individual who is:(1) eligible for TRICARE Reserve Select coverage; and(2) a member of the Pennsylvania National Guard.20250HB2011PN2565 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Immediate family." An individual specified in 10 U.S.C. § 1072(2)(A), (D) or (I) (relating to definitions)."Program." The TRICARE Premium Reimbursement Program established under subsection (a)(1)."TRICARE dental program." The program established in 10 U.S.C. § 1076a (relating to TRICARE dental program)."TRICARE Reserve Select." As defined in 10 U.S.C. § 1076d(f)(2) (relating to TRICARE program: TRICARE Reserve Select coverage for members of the Selected Reserve)."TRICARE Reserve Select program." The program established in 10 U.S.C. § 1076d.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 180 days.20250HB2011PN2565 - 3 - 123456789101112